District of Columbia statutes.
47-383

Grant application procedure.

(a)

All grant applications shall be prepared in the name of the government of the District of Columbia. Any agency, other than those referred to in subsection (b) of this section, which desires to receive grant funds or submit a state plan shall request approval by the Mayor subject to regulations issued by the Mayor in accordance with the provisions of § 2-505.

(b)

The Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, the Board of Education, and the D.C. General Hospital Commission shall submit to the Mayor two copies of the application and completed approval form, as an advisory notice, concurrent with submitting the application and completed approval form to a grant-making agency in accordance with rules and regulations issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

(c)

Those agencies identified in subsection (b) of this section shall, within 180 days of September 16, 1980, develop rules and regulations for grant applications review and approval consistent with the responsibilities of the governing bodies of those agencies, and such rules and regulations shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of § 2-505.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-104, § 4, 27 DCR 3748
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 754, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11245(c)(2)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-384 and § 47-385.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-383.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority to the City Administrator to Issue and Enforce Policies and Procedures for Grants and Subgrants, see Mayor’s Order 2010-168, October 15, 2010 ( 57 DCR 10008).